Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,150
Insurance Producers Licensing Act; applicability.

The Insurance Producers Licensing Act shall apply to health maintenance organization producers except to the extent that the director determines that the nature of health maintenance organizations renders application of the act clearly inappropriate.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 59.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.